New York, session 2025-2026, A8289.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 8 of the Indian law, as amended by chapter 886 of 2 the laws of 1957, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 8. Intrusion on tribal lands. 1. Except as otherwise provided by 4 law, no person shall enter, remain, settle or reside, conduct a busi- 5 ness, operate a junkyard, or establish or contribute to an automobile 6 graveyard or dump of any kind, upon any lands owned or occupied by any 7 nation, tribe or band of Indians, except the citizens or members of such 8 nation, tribe or band or their authorized guests or lessees. 9 2. Without the permission of the council or other similar authority of 10 any Indian reservation, no person shall hereafter establish, conduct and 11 operate, or contribute to the establishment, conduct and operation of 12 any junkyard, automobile graveyard or dump on any land within the limits 13 of an Indian reservation. Any lease, contract or agreement in violation 14 of this section shall be void. 15 3. The district attorney of any county in which reservation lands are 16 situated, upon the written application of such person or entity desig- 17 nated by the laws of the nation, tribe or band to make such application 18 on behalf of the nation, tribe or band owning and occupying such lands, 19 shall make complaint of any intrusions on such lands, and cause the 20 intruders to be removed. 21 4. The county judge of the county in which such lands are situated, 22 upon complaint made to [him] such judge, of a violation of this section 23 shall, if [he] such judge thinks there is reasonable ground therefor, 24 issue a notice directed to the person against whom complaint is made, 25 requiring [him] such person to appear before such judge at a time and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11875-01-5 A. 8289 2 1 place therein specified, to answer the complaint. Such judge shall 2 attend at the time and place mentioned in the notice, and upon proof of 3 the personal service of such notice, shall take proof of the facts 4 alleged in the complaint, and shall determine whether such person is an 5 intruder upon the lands of such reservation. If [he] such judge shall 6 determine that such person is an intruder, [he] such judge shall issue a 7 warrant to the sheriff of the county commanding [him] such sheriff, 8 within ten days after the receipt thereof, to remove such person from 9 such lands. If such judge shall determine that such person has been 10 removed from such lands on a previous occasion, [he] such judge shall 11 issue [his] such judge's warrant commanding the sheriff, within ten days 12 from the receipt thereof, to remove such person and, notwithstanding any 13 other provisions of law, commit [him] such person to the county jail for 14 the space of [thirty] ninety days, without being entitled to the limits 15 or the liberties of such jail; and such judge shall cause such 16 conviction to be drawn up and filed in the office of the county clerk, 17 which conviction shall be final. In the execution of either of such 18 warrants the sheriff shall have the same powers as in the execution of 19 criminal process, and shall be paid by the state such compensation as 20 the comptroller shall certify as reasonable. [The district attorney of 21 any county in which reservation lands are situated, upon the written 22 application of a majority of the chiefs, councilors or head man of the 23 nation, tribe or band owning and occupying such lands, shall make 24 complaint of any intrusions on such lands, and cause the intruders to be 25 removed.] 26 5. If a person, conducting a business, engaging in drug trafficking, 27 operating a junkyard, or having established or contributed to an automo- 28 bile graveyard or dump, shall have been determined to be an intruder 29 under this section, such judge may, in addition to any other penalty 30 prescribed by this section, order the confiscation or removal of such 31 business, drug trafficking materials or equipment, junkyard, automobile 32 graveyard or dump within a reasonable time subject to the consent of the 33 authority of the affected nation, tribe or band. 34 6. A determination or designation by the nation, tribe or band of a 35 person as an intruder upon the lands of such nation, tribe or band shall 36 be dispositive of the matter. 37 § 2. The Indian law is amended by adding a new section 79 to read as 38 follows: 39 § 79. Law enforcement agreements. 1. Notwithstanding any other 40 provision of law, at the request of the Seneca nation, the governor, the 41 superintendent of state police, a sheriff of a county that includes 42 lands of the Seneca nation, or the chief of police of the city of Sala- 43 manca, may enter into an agreement with the Seneca nation governing the 44 terms and conditions of criminal law enforcement activities within the 45 nation's federally-recognized Indian Country lands. 46 2. The agreements authorized in subdivision one of this section may 47 include provisions defining criminal offenses and penalties that shall 48 apply within the nation, deputization, extradition, and other related 49 provisions that may be agreed upon by the parties. 50 3. The courts of the state shall give full force and effect to the 51 provisions of any agreement authorized herein in any criminal proceeding 52 arising out of offenses committed within the lands of the Seneca nation. 53 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.